California statutes. Labor Code
 been ordered, shall order the person or employer to display prominently on its internet website, in an area which is accessible to all employees and the general public, or, if the person or employer does not have an internet website, to display prominently in an area that is accessible to all employees and the general public at each location where a violation of subdivision (a) occurred, a notice that sets forth all of the following:

(1) That the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a court, as applicable, has found that the person or employer has committed a serious violation of the law by engaging in the willful misclassification of employees.

(2) That the person or employer has changed its business practices in order to avoid committing further violations of this section.

(3) That any employee who believes
 that they are being misclassified as an independent contractor may contact the Labor and Workforce Development Agency. The notice shall include the mailing address, email address, and telephone number of the agency.

(4) That the notice is being posted pursuant to a state order.

(f) In addition to including the information specified in subdivision (e), a person or employer also shall satisfy the following requirements in preparing the notice:

(1) An officer shall sign the notice.

(2) It shall post the notice for one year commencing with the date of the final decision and order.

(g) (1) In accordance with the procedures set forth in Sections 98, 98.1, 98.2, 98.3, 98.7,
 98.74, or 1197.1, the Labor Commissioner may enforce this section and issue a determination that a person or employer has violated subdivision (a). This enforcement of this section may include investigating an alleged violation of subdivision (a), ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation or to maintain the status quo pending the completion of an investigation or hearing, issuance of a citation against an employer who violates subdivision (a), and filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as appropriate. A public prosecutor, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 181, may also enforce this section by seeking the damages described in paragraph (2).

(2) In any enforcement pursuant to this subdivision, for each employee subject
 to Sections 98 to 98.2, inclusive, the Labor Commissioner under Section 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, or a public prosecutor, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 181, may alternatively recover the penalties set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) as damages payable to the employee. An employee is entitled to either recover the damages as provided for in this section or to enforce a civil penalty, as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2699, but not both, for the same violation. Except as specified in this section, the remedy provided by this section is cumulative and does not limit the availability of any other remedy available to the employee.

(h) Any administrative or civil penalty, damages, or disciplinary action pursuant to this section shall remain in effect against any successor corporation, owner, or business entity that satisfies both of the following:

(1) Has one
 or more of the same principals or officers as the person or employer subject to the penalty or action.

(2) Is engaged in the same or a similar business as the person or employer subject to the penalty or action.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Determination” means an order, decision, award, or citation issued by an agency or a court of competent jurisdiction for which the time to appeal has expired and for which no appeal is pending.

(2) “Labor and Workforce Development Agency” means the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or any of its departments, divisions, commissions, boards, or agencies.

(3) “Officer” means the chief executive officer,
 president, any vice president in charge of a principal business unit, division, or function, or any other officer of the corporation who performs a policymaking function. If the employer is a partnership, “officer” means a partner. If the employer is a sole proprietor, “officer” means the owner.

(4) “Willful misclassification” means avoiding employee status for an individual by voluntarily and knowingly misclassifying that individual as an independent contractor.

(j) Nothing in this section is intended to limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 133.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

227.

If an employer has made withholdings from an employee’s wages pursuant to state, local, or federal law, or has agreed with any employee to make payments to a health or welfare fund, pension fund, or vacation plan, or other similar plan for the benefit of the employees, or a negotiated industrial promotion fund, or has entered into a collective bargaining agreement providing for these payments, it shall be unlawful for that employer willfully or with intent to defraud to fail to remit the withholdings to the proper agency or to fail to make the payments required by the terms of that agreement. A violation of any provision of this section when the amount the employer failed to pay into the fund or funds exceeds five hundred dollars ($500) shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section
 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. All other violations shall be punishable as a misdemeanor. In a criminal proceeding under this section, any withholdings that are recovered from an employer shall be forwarded to the appropriate fund or plan and, if restitution is imposed, the court shall direct to which agency, entity, or person it shall be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.   (SB 390)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

227.3.

Unless otherwise provided by a collective-bargaining agreement, whenever a contract of employment or employer policy provides for paid vacations, and an employee is terminated without having taken off his vested vacation time, all vested vacation shall be paid to him as wages at his final rate in accordance with such contract of employment or employer policy respecting eligibility or time served; provided, however, that an employment contract or employer policy shall not provide for forfeiture of vested vacation time upon termination. The Labor Commissioner or a designated representative, in the resolution of any dispute with regard to vested vacation time, shall apply the principles of equity and fairness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

227.5.

Whenever an employer has agreed with any employee to make payments to a health or welfare fund, pension fund or vacation plan, or such other plan for the benefit of the employee, or has entered into a collective bargaining agreement providing for such payments, the employer upon written request of the employee shall furnish such employee annually a statement indicating whether or not such payments have been made and for what periods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 898.)
-------------------------------------------

228.

The payments under Section 227 of this code shall be deemed to include payments to apprenticeship funds.

This amendment is hereby declared to be merely a clarification of the original intention of the Legislature and is not a substantive change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1218.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

Actions to enforce the provisions of this article for the collection of due and unpaid wages claimed by an individual may be maintained without regard to the existence of any private agreement to arbitrate. This section shall not apply to claims involving any dispute concerning the interpretation or application of any collective bargaining agreement containing such an arbitration agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1939.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

(a) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee for taking time off to serve as required by law on an inquest jury or trial jury, if the employee, prior to taking the time off, gives reasonable notice to the employer that the employee is required to serve.

(b) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against an employee, including, but not limited to, an employee who is a victim of a crime, for taking time off to appear in court to comply with a subpoena or other court order as a witness in any judicial proceeding.

(c) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against an employee
 who is a victim for taking time off from work to obtain or attempt to obtain any relief. Relief includes, but is not limited to, a temporary restraining order, restraining order, or other injunctive relief, to help ensure the health, safety, or welfare of the victim or their child.

(d) (1) As a condition of taking time off for a purpose set forth in subdivision (c), the employee shall give the employer reasonable advance notice of the employee’s intention to take time off, unless the advance notice is not feasible.

(2) When an unscheduled absence occurs, the employer shall not take any action against the employee if the employee, within a reasonable time after the absence, provides a certification to the employer. Certification shall be sufficient in the form of any of the following:

(A) A
 police report indicating that the employee was a victim.

(B) A court order protecting or separating the employee from the perpetrator of the crime or abuse, or other evidence from the court or prosecuting attorney that the employee has appeared in court.

(C) Documentation from a licensed medical professional, domestic violence counselor, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, victim advocate, licensed health care provider, or counselor that the employee was undergoing treatment or receiving services for physical or mental injuries or abuse resulting in victimization from the crime or abuse.

(D) Any other form of documentation that reasonably verifies that the crime or abuse occurred, including, but not limited to, a written
 statement signed by the employee, or an individual acting on the employee’s behalf, certifying that the absence is for a purpose authorized under this section or under Section 230.1.

(3) To the extent allowed by law and consistent with subparagraph (D) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (f), the employer shall maintain the confidentiality of any employee requesting leave under subdivision (c).

(e) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against an employee because of the employee’s status as a victim of crime or abuse, if the employee provides notice to the employer of the status or the employer has actual knowledge of the status.

(f) (1) An employer shall provide reasonable accommodations for a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, who
 requests an accommodation for the safety of the victim while at work.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, reasonable accommodations may include the implementation of safety measures, including a transfer, reassignment, modified schedule, changed work telephone, changed work station, installed lock, assistance in documenting domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, or other crime that occurs in the workplace, an implemented safety procedure, or another adjustment to a job structure, workplace facility, or work requirement in response to domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, or other crime, or referral to a victim assistance organization.

(3) An employer is not required to provide a reasonable accommodation to an employee who has not disclosed the employee’s status as a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking.

(4) The employer shall engage in a timely, good faith, and interactive process with the employee to determine effective reasonable accommodations.

(5) In determining whether the accommodation is reasonable, the employer shall consider an exigent circumstance or danger facing the employee.

(6) This subdivision does not require the employer to undertake an action that constitutes an undue hardship on the employer’s business operations, as defined by Section 12926 of the Government Code. For the purposes of this subdivision, an undue hardship also includes an action that would violate an employer’s duty to furnish and maintain a place of employment that is safe and healthful for all employees as required by Section 6400 of the Labor Code.

(7) (A) Upon the request of an employer, an employee requesting a reasonable accommodation pursuant to this subdivision shall provide the employer a written statement signed by the employee or an individual acting on the employee’s behalf, certifying that the accommodation is for a purpose authorized under this subdivision.

(B) The employer may also request certification from an employee requesting an accommodation pursuant to this subdivision demonstrating the employee’s status as a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking. Certification shall be sufficient in the form of any of the categories described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(C) An employer who requests certification pursuant to subparagraph (B) may request recertification of an employee’s status as a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or ongoing circumstances related
 to the crime or abuse, every six months after the date of the previous certification.

(D) Any verbal or written statement, police or court record, or other documentation provided to an employer identifying an employee as a victim shall be maintained as confidential by the employer and shall not be disclosed by the employer except as required by federal or state law or as necessary to protect the employee’s safety in the workplace. The employee shall be given notice before any authorized disclosure.

(E) (i) If circumstances change and an employee needs a new accommodation, the employee shall request a new accommodation from the employer.

(ii) Upon receiving the request, the employer shall engage in a timely, good faith, and interactive process with the employee to determine effective reasonable
 accommodations.

(F) If an employee no longer needs an accommodation, the employee shall notify the employer that the accommodation is no longer needed.

(8) An employer shall not retaliate against a victim for requesting a reasonable accommodation, regardless of whether the request was granted.

(g) (1) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has taken time off for a purpose set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer.

(2) An employee who is
 discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer for reasons prohibited in subdivision (c) or (e), or because the employee has requested or received a reasonable accommodation as set forth in subdivision (f), shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer, as well as appropriate equitable relief.

(3) An employer who willfully refuses to rehire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure or hearing authorized by law is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(h) (1) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner
 discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has exercised their rights as set forth in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (e), or (f) may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 98.7.

(2) Notwithstanding any time limitation in Section 98.7, an employee may file a complaint with the division based upon a violation of subdivision (c), (e), or (f) within one year from the date of occurrence of the violation.

(i) An employee may use vacation, personal leave, or compensatory time off that is otherwise available to the employee under the applicable terms of employment, unless otherwise provided by a collective bargaining agreement, for time taken off for a purpose specified in subdivision (a), (b), or (c). The entitlement of any
 employee under this section shall not be diminished by any collective bargaining agreement term or condition.

(j) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Crime” means a crime or public offense as set forth in Section 13951 of the Government Code, and regardless of whether any person is arrested for, prosecuted for, or convicted of, committing the crime.

(2) “Domestic violence” means any of the types of abuse set forth in Section 6211 of the Family Code, as amended.

(3) “Immediate family member” means a person who is any of the following:

(A) Regardless of age, a biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, or legal ward, a child of a domestic partner, a child to whom the employee stands in
 loco parentis, or a person to whom the employee stood in loco parentis when the person was a minor.

(B) A biological, adoptive, or foster parent, stepparent, or legal guardian of an employee or an employee’s spouse or domestic partner, or a person who stood in loco parentis when the employee or the employee’s spouse or domestic partner was a minor child.

(C) A person to whom the employee is legally married under the laws of any state, or a domestic partner of an employee as registered under the laws of any state or political subdivision.

(D) A biological, foster, or adoptive sibling, a stepsibling, or a half sibling.

(E) Any other individual whose close association with the employee is the equivalent of a family relationship described in subparagraph
 (A), (B), (C), or (D).

(4) “Sexual assault” means any of the crimes set forth in Section 261, 261.5, 262, 265, 266, 266a, 266b, 266c, 266g, 266j, 267, 269, 273.4, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 311.4 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code, as amended.

(5) “Stalking” means a crime set forth in Section 646.9 of the Penal Code or Section 1708.7 of the Civil Code.

(6) “Victim” includes any of the following:

(A) A victim of stalking, domestic violence, or sexual assault.

(B) A victim of a crime that caused physical injury or that caused mental injury and a threat of physical injury.

(C) A person whose immediate family
 member is deceased as the direct result of a crime.

(D) For the purposes of subdivision (b) only, any person against whom any crime has been committed.

(7) “Victim advocate” means an individual, whether paid or serving as a volunteer, who provides services to victims under the auspices or supervision of an agency or organization that has a documented record of providing services to victims, or under the auspices or supervision of a court or a law enforcement or prosecution agency.

(k) This section shall apply only to alleged actions or inactions occurring on or before December 31, 2024.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 148, Sec. 2.   (AB 406)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

230.1.

(a) In addition to the requirements and prohibitions imposed on employees pursuant to Section 230, an employer with 25 or more employees shall not discharge, or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against, an employee who is a victim, for taking time off from work for any of the following purposes:

(1) To seek medical attention for injuries caused by crime or abuse.

(2) To obtain services from a domestic violence shelter, program, rape crisis center, or victim services organization or agency as a result of the crime or abuse.

(3) To obtain psychological counseling or mental health services related to an experience
 of crime or abuse.

(4) To participate in safety planning and take other actions to increase safety from future crime or abuse, including temporary or permanent relocation.

(b) (1) As a condition of taking time off for a purpose set forth in subdivision (a), the employee shall give the employer reasonable advance notice of the employee’s intention to take time off, unless the advance notice is not feasible.

(2) When an unscheduled absence occurs, the employer shall not take any action against the employee if the employee, within a reasonable time after the absence, provides a certification to the employer. Certification shall be sufficient in the form of any of the categories described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 230.

(3) To the extent allowed by law and consistent with subparagraph (D) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (f) of Section 230, employers shall maintain the confidentiality of any employee requesting leave under subdivision (a).

(c) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has taken time off for a purpose set forth in subdivision (a) is entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer, as well as appropriate equitable relief. An employer who willfully refuses to rehire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure or hearing authorized by law is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) (1) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has exercised their rights as set forth in subdivision (a) may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 98.7.

(2) Notwithstanding any time limitation in Section 98.7, an employee may file a complaint with the division based upon a violation of subdivision (a) within one year from the date of occurrence of the violation.

(e) An employee may use vacation, personal leave, or compensatory time off that is otherwise available to the employee under the applicable terms of employment, unless
 otherwise provided by a collective bargaining agreement, for time taken off for a purpose specified in subdivision (a). The entitlement of any employee under this section shall not be diminished by any term or condition of a collective bargaining agreement.

(f) This section does not create a right for an employee to take unpaid leave that exceeds the unpaid leave time allowed under, or is in addition to the unpaid leave time permitted by, the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(g) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Crime” means a crime or public offense as set forth in Section 13951 of the Government Code, and regardless of whether any person is arrested for, prosecuted for, or convicted of, committing the crime.

(2) “Domestic violence” means any of the types of abuse set forth in Section 6211 of the Family Code, as amended.

(3) “Immediate family member” means a person who is any of the following:

(A) Regardless of age, a biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, or legal ward, a child of a domestic partner, a child to whom the employee stands in loco parentis, or a person to whom the employee stood in loco parentis when the person was a minor.

(B) A biological, adoptive, or foster parent, stepparent, or legal guardian of an employee or an employee’s spouse or domestic partner, or a person who stood in loco parentis when the employee or the employee’s spouse or domestic partner was a minor child.

(C) A person to whom the employee is legally
 married under the laws of any state, or a domestic partner of an employee as registered under the laws of any state or political subdivision.

(D) A biological, foster, or adoptive sibling, a stepsibling, or a half sibling.

(E) Any other individual whose close association with the employee is the equivalent of a family relationship described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D).

(4) “Sexual assault” means any of the crimes set forth in Section 261, 261.5, 262, 265, 266, 266a, 266b, 266c, 266g, 266j, 267, 269, 273.4, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 311.4 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code, as amended.

(5) “Stalking” means a crime set forth in Section 646.9 of the Penal Code or Section 1708.7 of the Civil Code.

(6) “Victim” includes any of the following:

(A) A victim of stalking, domestic violence, or sexual assault.

(B) A victim of a crime that caused physical injury or that caused mental injury and a threat of physical injury.

(C) A person whose immediate family member is deceased as the direct result of a crime.

(7) “Victim services organization or agency” means an agency or organization that has a documented record of providing services to victims.

(h) (1) Employers shall inform each employee of their rights established under this section and subdivisions (c), (e), and (f) of Section 230 in writing. The
 information shall be provided to new employees upon hire and to other employees upon request.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall develop a form that an employer may use to comply with the notice requirements in paragraph (1). The form shall set forth the rights and duties of employers and employees under this section in clear and concise language. The Labor Commissioner shall post the form on the commissioner’s internet website to make it available to employers who are required to comply with this section. If an employer elects not to use the form developed by the Labor Commissioner, the notice provided by the employer to the employees shall be substantially similar in content and clarity to the form developed by the Labor Commissioner. The Labor Commissioner shall revise the form and post it in accordance with this paragraph on or before January 1, 2022.

(3) Employers shall not be
 required to comply with paragraph (1) until the Labor Commissioner posts the form on the commissioner’s internet website in accordance with paragraph (2).

(i) This section shall apply only to alleged actions or inactions occurring on or before December 31, 2024.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 148, Sec. 3.   (AB 406)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

230.2.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Immediate family member” means spouse, child, stepchild, brother, stepbrother, sister, stepsister, mother, stepmother, father, or stepfather.

(2) “Registered domestic partner” means a domestic partner, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, and registered pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 298) of Division 2.5 of the Family Code.

(3) “Victim” means a person against whom one of the following crimes has been committed:

(A) A violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(B) A serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(C) A felony provision of law proscribing theft or embezzlement.

(b) An employer, and any agent of an employer, shall allow an employee who is a victim of a crime, an immediate family member of a victim, a registered domestic partner of a victim, or the child of a registered domestic partner of a victim to be absent from work in order to attend judicial proceedings related to that crime.

(c) Before an employee may be absent from work pursuant to subdivision (b), the employee shall give the employer a copy of the notice of each scheduled proceeding that is provided to the victim by the agency responsible for providing notice, unless advance notice is not feasible. When
 advance notice is not feasible or an unscheduled absence occurs, the employer shall not take any action against the employee if the employee, within a reasonable time after the absence, provides the employer with documentation evidencing the judicial proceeding from any of the following entities:

(1) The court or government agency setting the hearing.

(2) The district attorney or prosecuting attorney’s office.

(3) The victim/witness office that is advocating on behalf of the victim.

(d) An employee who is absent from work pursuant to subdivision (b) may elect to use the employee’s accrued paid vacation time, personal leave time, sick leave time, compensatory time off that is otherwise available to the employee, or unpaid leave time, unless otherwise
 provided by a collective bargaining agreement, for an absence pursuant to subdivision (b). The entitlement of any employee under this section shall not be diminished by any collective bargaining agreement term or condition.

(e) An employer shall keep confidential any records regarding the employee’s absence from work pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) An employer may not discharge from employment or in any manner discriminate against an employee, in compensation or other terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, including, but not limited to, the loss of seniority or precedence, because the employee is absent from work pursuant to this section.

(g) (1) Any employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in
 the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has exercised their rights as set forth in subdivision (b) may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 98.7.

(2) Notwithstanding any time limitation in Section 98.7, an employee filing a complaint with the division based upon a violation of subdivision (b) shall have one year from the date of occurrence of the violation to file a complaint.

(h) District attorney and victim/witness offices are encouraged to make information regarding this section available for distribution at their offices.

(i) This section shall apply only to alleged actions or inactions occurring on or before December 31, 2025.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 148, Sec. 4.   (AB 406)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

230.3.

(a) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee for taking time off to perform emergency duty as a volunteer firefighter, a reserve peace officer, or emergency rescue personnel.

(b) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment by his or her employer because the employee has taken time off to perform emergency duty as a volunteer firefighter, a reserve peace officer, or emergency rescue personnel shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the
 acts of the employer. Any employer who willfully refuses to rehire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure, arbitration, or hearing authorized by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) (1) Subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to
 any public safety agency or provider of emergency medical services if, as determined by the employer, the employee’s absence would hinder the availability of public safety or emergency medical services.

(2) An employee who is a health care provider shall notify his or her employer at the time the employee becomes designated as emergency rescue personnel and when the employee is notified that he or she will be deployed as a result of that designation.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “volunteer firefighter” shall have the same meaning as the term “volunteer” in Section 50952 of the Government Code.

(2) For
 purposes of this section, “emergency rescue personnel” means any person who is an officer, employee, or member of a fire department or fire protection or firefighting agency of the federal government, the State of California, a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision of this state, or of a sheriff’s department, police department, or a private fire department, or of a disaster medical response entity sponsored or requested by this state, whether that person is a volunteer or partly paid or fully paid, while he or she is actually engaged in providing emergency services as defined by Section 1799.107 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) For purposes of this section, “health care provider” means any person licensed or
 certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   (AB 2536)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

230.4.

(a) An employee who performs duty as a volunteer firefighter, a reserve peace officer, or as emergency rescue personnel, as defined in Section 230.3, and who works for an employer employing 50 or more employees, shall be permitted to take temporary leaves of absence, not to exceed an aggregate of 14 days per calendar year, for the purpose of engaging in fire, law enforcement, or emergency rescue training.

(b) An employee who works for an employer employing 50 or more employees who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment by his or her employer because the employee has taken time off to engage in fire, law enforcement,
 or emergency rescue training as provided in subdivision (a), is entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer.

(c) An employee seeking reinstatement and reimbursement pursuant to this section may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in accordance with Section 98.7 and, upon receipt of this type of complaint, the Labor Commissioner shall proceed as provided in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 108.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

230.5.

(a) (1) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against an employee who is a victim of an offense listed in paragraph (2) for taking time off from work, upon the victim’s request, to appear in court to be heard at any proceeding, including any delinquency proceeding, involving a postarrest release decision, plea, sentencing, postconviction release decision, or any proceeding in which a right of the victim is at issue.

(2) The offenses include all of the following:

(A) Vehicular manslaughter while intoxicated, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code.

(B) Felony child abuse likely to produce great bodily harm or a death, as defined in Section 273a of the Penal Code.

(C) Assault resulting in the death of a child under eight years of age, as defined in Section 273ab of the Penal Code.

(D) Felony domestic violence, as defined in Section 273.5 of the Penal Code.

(E) Felony physical abuse of an elder or dependent adult, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 368 of the Penal Code.

(F) Felony stalking, as defined in Section 646.9 of the Penal Code.

(G) Solicitation for murder, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 653f of the Penal Code.

(H) A serious felony,
 as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(I) Hit-and-run causing death or injury, as defined in Section 20001 of the Vehicle Code.

(J) Felony driving under the influence causing injury, as defined in Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(K) Sexual assault as set forth in Section 261, 261.5, 262, 265, 266, 266a, 266b, 266c, 266g, 266j, 267, 269, 273.4, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 311.4 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code.

(b) (1) As a condition of taking time off for a purpose set forth in subdivision (a), the employee shall give the employer reasonable advance notice of the employee’s intention to take time off, unless the advance notice is not feasible.

(2) When an unscheduled absence occurs, the employer shall not take any action against the employee if the employee, within a reasonable time after the absence, provides a certification to the employer. Certification shall be sufficient in the form of any of the following:

(A) A police report indicating that the employee was a victim of an offense specified in subdivision (a).

(B) A court order protecting or separating the employee from the perpetrator of an offense specified in subdivision (a), or other evidence from the court or prosecuting attorney that the employee has appeared in court.

(C) Documentation from a medical professional, domestic violence advocate or advocate for victims of sexual assault, health care provider, or counselor that the
 employee was undergoing treatment for physical or mental injuries or abuse resulting in victimization from an offense specified in subdivision (a).

(3) To the extent allowed by law, the employer shall maintain the confidentiality of any employee requesting leave under subdivision (a).

(c) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has taken time off for a purpose set forth in subdivision (a) shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer. Any employer who willfully refuses to rehire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure or
 hearing authorized by law is guilty of a misdemeanor.
